en: Maasdam-type firm cheese with around 27% fat
fr: fromage type Maasdam 27% MG
hr: tvrdi sir tipa maasdam s oko 27% masti

fr: Maasdam râpé
ca: formatge maasdam ratllat
es: queso maasdam rallado
nl: geraspte Maasdam

en: Maroilles
xx: Maroilles
fr: maroilles AOP
ja: マロリーズ
ko: 마루아유
ru: Марой
uk: Марой
wa: Marwale
zh: 瑪瑞里斯芝士

en: industrial Maroille
fr: Maroilles laitier
hr: industrijski maroille
it: maroille industriale

en: farmers Maroilles
fr: Maroilles fermier
hr: farmeri maroilles
it: agricoltori Maroilles

en: mascarpone, Mascarpone Cheese
af: Mascarpone
ar: ماسكربوني
az: Maskarpone
be: Маскарпонэ
bg: маскарпоне
bn: ম্যাসকারপোন
ca: mascarpone
cs: mascarpone
cv: Маскарпоне
da: mascarpone
de: Mascarpone, Mascarpone Frischkäse
el: μασκαρπόνε
eo: Maskarpono
es: mascarpone, queso mascarpone
et: mascarpone
fa: ماسکارپونه
fi: mascarpone, mascarponejuusto
fr: mascarpone, fromage mascarpone
gl: Mascarpone
he: מסקרפונה
hr: mascarpone
hu: Mascarpone
hy: Մասկարպոնե
id: Mascarpone
is: Mascarpone
it: mascarpone, formaggio mascarpone
ja: マスカルポーネ
ka: მასკარპონე
kn: 마스카르포네
lt: Maskarponė
mk: маскарпоне
nb: mascarpone
nl: mascarpone
nn: mascarpone
pa: ਮਾਸਕਾਰਪੋਨੀ
pl: Mascarpone
pt: Mascarpone
ro: Mascarpone
ru: маскарпоне
sk: Mascarpone
sr: маскарпоне
sw: mascarpone
tr: mascarpone
uk: Маскарпоне
vi: Mascarpone
zh: 马斯卡邦尼奶酪

en: mimolette, Mimolette cheese, Mimolette cheese from cow's milk
xx: mimolette
ar: ميموليت
bg: Мимолет
ca: formatge mimolette
cv: Мимолет
es: queso mimolette
fr: Mimolette sans précision
ja: ミモレット
ko: 미몰레트
ru: Мимолет
uk: Мімолет
zh: 米莫雷特芝士

en: young Mimolette, young Mimolette cheese, young Mimolette cheese from cow's milk
fr: Mimolette jeune
hr: mladi mimolet
it: mimolette giovane

en: half-old Mimolette, half-old Mimolette cheese, half-old Mimolette cheese from cow's milk
fr: Mimolette demi-vieille
hr: polustari mimolet

en: old Mimolette, old Mimolette cheese, old Mimolette cheese from cow's milk
fr: Mimolette vieille
hr: stari mimolet
it: mimolette stagionata

en: extra old Mimolette, extra old Mimolette cheese, extra old Mimolette cheese from cow's milk
fr: Mimolette extra-vieille
hr: ekstra stari mimolet
it: mimolette extra vecchia

en: Monterey Jack, Monterey Jack Cheese
de: Monterey Jack
es: Monterey Jack
fi: monterey jack
fr: Monterey jack, fromage monterey jack
hr: monterey Jack
it: Monterey Jack
ja: モントレー・ジャック
ko: 몬터레이 잭
nb: monterey jack
pl: monterey jack
th: มอนเตอเรย์แจ็ก
tr: monterey jack
zh: 傑克芝士

en: pepper jack, pepper jack cheese
de: Pepper Jack, Pepper-Jack-Käse
fr: Fromage Peppers Jack /Fromage aux poivres
hr: pepper jack
it: pepper jack

en: morbier, morbier AOP
xx: morbier, morbier AOP
ja: モルビエ
ko: 모르비에
ru: Морбье
uk: Морб'є
zh: 莫爾比耶乾酪

en: mozzarella, mozzarella cheese, mozzarella soft cheese
xx: mozzarella
ar: موتزاريلا
be: Мацарэла
bg: Моцарела
bn: মজারেলা পনির
bo: མོ་ཟ་རེལ་ལ།
bs: mocarela
ca: mozzarella, formatge mozzarella
cs: mozzarella, sýr mozzarella
cv: Моцарелла
cy: Mosarela
da: mozzarella, mozzarella ost
de: Mozzarella, Mozzarella-Käse
el: Μοτσαρέλα, τυρι Μοτσαρέλλα
eo: Mocarelo
es: mozzarella, queso mozzarella, queso mozarella
fa: موزارلا
fi: mozzarellajuusto, mozzarellajuustoa, mozzarella-juusto
fr: mozzarella, fromage mozzarella, mozzarelle, fromage mozzarelle
he: מוצרלה
hi: मोत्ज़ारेला
hr: mocarela, mozzarella, mozzarella sir
hy: Մոցարելա
it: mozzarella, formaggio mozzarella, formaggi di mozzarella
ja: モッツァレッラ
ka: მოცარელა
kk: Моцарелла
kn: ಮೋಟ್ಸರೆಲ್ಲಾ ಚೀಸ್
ko: 모차렐라
lt: Mocarela
lv: mocarella
mk: Моцарела
mr: मोजारेला
nl: mozzarella, mozzarella kaas
nn: mozzarella, mozzarella ost
or: ମୋଜ୍ଜରେଲା
pa: ਮੋਜ਼ਾਰੇਲਾ
pl: mozzarella, ser mozzarella, mozarelli, ser mozarella
pt: mozzarella, queijo mozzarella
ru: моцарелла
sh: Mocarela
sk: mozzarella, syr mozzarella
sl: Mocarela
sq: mocarela
sr: моцарела
sv: mozzarella, mozzarellaost, mozzarella-ost
th: มอซซาเรลลา
uk: Моцарела
ur: موزاریلا
zh: 莫薩里拉乾酪

en: cow mozzarella, cow milk mozzarella
fr: mozzarella de vache, mozzarella au lait de vache
hr: kravlja mozzarella
it: mozzarella di vacca
pl: ser mozzarella z mleka krowiego

en: buffalo mozzarella, buffalo milk mozzarella
fr: mozzarella de bufflonne, mozzarella au lait de bufflonne
hr: buffalo mozzarella
it: mozzarella di bufala
pl: ser mozzarella z mleka bawolego, ser mozzarella di Bufala

en: low moisture mozzarella
hr: mozzarella niske vlažnosti
it: mozzarella a bassa umidità

en: part skim mozzarella
hr: dio obrane mozzarelle
it: parte della mozzarella scremata

en: whole milk mozzarella
hr: mozzarella od punomasnog mlijeka
it: mozzarella di latte intero